test/tools/fsmbook-tests/lexc-files/EsperantoAdjectives.lexc
LEXICON Root
	Adjectives ;
	AdjPrefix ;

LEXICON AdjPrefix
mal	Adjectives ;
ne	Adjectives ;

LEXICON Adjectives
bon	Adj ;
long	Adj ;
jun	Adj ;
alt	Adj ;
grav	Adj ;

LEXICON Adj
eg	Adj ;
et	Adj ;
	Adjend ;

LEXICON Adjend
a	Number ;

LEXICON Number
j	Case ;
	Case ;

LEXICON Case
n	# ;
	# ;
